Utah statutes.
41-4-8.   Violation by foreign corporation -- Penalty.
Every foreign corporation, as well as every foreign association, exercising
any of the powers, franchises, or functions of a corporation in this state,
violating any of the provisions of this act, is hereby denied the right and
prohibited from doing any business in this state, and it shall be the duty of
the attorney general to enforce this provision by bringing proper proceedings
by injunction or otherwise. The Division of Corporations and Commercial Code
shall be authorized to revoke the license of any such corporation or
association heretofore authorized by it to do business in this state.
